Hawaii statutes.
[§28-5.2] Protection of charitable assets;
attorney general's authority. (a) The attorney general shall represent
the public interest in the protection of charitable assets and may:

(1) Enforce the application of a charitable asset in
accordance with:

(A) The law and terms governing the use,
management, investment, distribution, and expenditure of the charitable asset;
and

(B) The charitable purpose of the person
holding the asset;

(2) Act to prevent or remedy:

(A) The misapplication, diversion, or waste
of a charitable asset; or

(B) A breach of fiduciary or other legal duty
in the governance, management, or administration of a charitable asset; or

(3) Commence or intervene in an action to:

(A) Prevent, remedy, or obtain damages for:

(i) The misapplication, diversion, or waste of
a charitable asset; or

(ii) A breach of fiduciary or other legal duty
in the governance, management, or administration of a charitable asset; or

(B) Determine that an asset is a charitable
asset.

(b) If the attorney general has reason to
believe an investigation is necessary to determine whether action is advisable
under this section, the attorney general may conduct an investigation,
including exercising administrative subpoena power under sections 28-2.5 and
467B-9.3.

(c) This section shall not limit the powers
and duties of the attorney general under the laws of this State.

(d) As used in this section, "charitable
asset" means property that is given, received, or held for a charitable
purpose. The term does not include property acquired or held for a for-profit
purpose. [L 2014, c 217, §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next